Illinois, session 104th, HB4407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-3.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3.5)7    Sec. 11-74.4-3.5. Completion dates for redevelopment 8projects.9    (a) Unless otherwise stated in this Section, the estimated 10dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 11retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 12project costs (including refunding bonds under Section 1311-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the year in 14which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as provided in 15subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, is to be made 16with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 23rd calendar 17year (i) after the year in which the ordinance approving the 18redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance was 19adopted on or after January 15, 1981 through the effective 20date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly or 21(ii) after the year in which the first project started using 22the moneys from the special tax allocation fund if the 23ordinance was adopted after the effective date of this   HB4407- 2 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The start of the 223 years under paragraph (ii) commences no later than 10 years 3after the year in which the ordinance approving the 4redevelopment project area was adopted even if no projects 5have been started using the moneys from the special tax 6allocation fund.7    (a-5) If the redevelopment project area is located within 8a transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 9Section 11-74.4-3, the estimated dates of completion of the 10redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 11finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 12under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 13the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as 14provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, 15is to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 1635th calendar year after the year in which the ordinance 17approving the redevelopment project area was adopted. 18    (a-7) A municipality may adopt tax increment financing for 19a redevelopment project area located in a transit facility 20improvement area that also includes real property located 21within an existing redevelopment project area established 22prior to August 12, 2016 (the effective date of Public Act 2399-792). In such case: (i) the provisions of this Division 24shall apply with respect to the previously established 25redevelopment project area until the municipality adopts, as 26required in accordance with applicable provisions of this   HB4407- 3 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1Division, an ordinance dissolving the special tax allocation 2fund for such redevelopment project area and terminating the 3designation of such redevelopment project area as a 4redevelopment project area; and (ii) after the effective date 5of the ordinance described in (i), the provisions of this 6Division shall apply with respect to the subsequently 7established redevelopment project area located in a transit 8facility improvement area. 9    (b) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 10project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 11redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 12Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 13year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 14provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 15to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 16calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 17the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 18was adopted on September 9, 1999 by the Village of Downs. 19    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 20project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 21redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 22Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 23year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 24provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 25to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 33rd 26calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving   HB4407- 4 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 2was adopted on May 20, 1985 by the Village of Wheeling.3    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 4project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 5redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 6Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 7year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 8provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 9to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 28th 10calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 11the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 12was adopted on October 12, 1989 by the City of Lawrenceville. 13    (b-5) The estimated dates of completion of the 14redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 15finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 16under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 17the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 18provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 19to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 20calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 21the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 22was adopted on April 19, 2004 by the Village of Tremont. 23    (c) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 24project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 25redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 26Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the   HB4407- 5 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 2provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 3to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 35th 4calendar year (i) after the year in which the ordinance 5approving the redevelopment project area was adopted if the 6ordinance was adopted on or before the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly or (ii) after the 8year in which start of the initial 23 years commenced under 9subsection (a) if the ordinance was adopted after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly:12        (1) If the ordinance was adopted before January 15, 13    1981.14        (2) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1983, 15    April 1984, July 1985, or December 1989.16        (3) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1987 and 17    the redevelopment project is located within one mile of 18    Midway Airport.19        (4) If the ordinance was adopted before January 1, 20    1987 by a municipality in Mason County.21        (5) If the municipality is subject to the Local 22    Government Financial Planning and Supervision Act or the 23    Financially Distressed City Law.24        (6) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1984 by 25    the Village of Rosemont.26        (7) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986   HB4407- 6 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    by a municipality located in Clinton County for which at 2    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 3    June 17, 1997, or if the ordinance was adopted on December 4    31, 1986 by a municipality with a population in 1990 of 5    less than 3,600 that is located in a county with a 6    population in 1990 of less than 34,000 and for which at 7    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 8    June 17, 1997.9        (8) If the ordinance was adopted on October 5, 1982 by 10    the City of Kankakee, or if the ordinance was adopted on 11    December 29, 1986 by East St. Louis.12        (9) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1991 13    by the Village of Sauget.14        (10) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 1985 15    by the City of Rock Island.16        (11) If the ordinance was adopted before December 18, 17    1986 by the City of Moline.18        (12) If the ordinance was adopted in September 1988 by 19    Sauk Village.20        (13) If the ordinance was adopted in October 1993 by 21    Sauk Village.22        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 23    by the City of Galva.24        (15) If the ordinance was adopted in March 1991 by the 25    City of Centreville.26        (16) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 1991   HB4407- 7 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    by the City of East St. Louis.2        (17) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 3    by the City of Aledo.4        (18) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1990 5    by the City of Clinton.6        (19) If the ordinance was adopted on September 6, 1994 7    by the City of Freeport.8        (20) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 9    by the City of Tuscola.10        (21) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 11    by the City of Sparta.12        (22) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 13    by the City of Beardstown.14        (23) If the ordinance was adopted on April 27, 1981, 15    October 21, 1985, or December 30, 1986 by the City of 16    Belleville.17        (24) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 18    by the City of Collinsville.19        (25) If the ordinance was adopted on September 14, 20    1994 by the City of Alton.21        (26) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1996 22    by the City of Lexington.23        (27) If the ordinance was adopted on November 5, 1984 24    by the City of LeRoy.25        (28) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1991 or 26    June 3, 1992 by the City of Markham.  HB4407- 8 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (29) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1986 2    by the City of Pekin.3        (30) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1981 4    by the City of Champaign.5        (31) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 6    by the City of Urbana.7        (32) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 8    by the Village of Heyworth.9        (33) If the ordinance was adopted on February 24, 1992 10    by the Village of Heyworth.11        (34) If the ordinance was adopted on March 16, 1995 by 12    the Village of Heyworth.13        (35) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 14    by the Town of Cicero.15        (36) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 16    by the City of Effingham.17        (37) If the ordinance was adopted on May 9, 1991 by the 18    Village of Tilton.19        (38) If the ordinance was adopted on October 20, 1986 20    by the City of Elmhurst.21        (39) If the ordinance was adopted on January 19, 1988 22    by the City of Waukegan.23        (40) If the ordinance was adopted on September 21, 24    1998 by the City of Waukegan.25        (41) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 26    by the City of Sullivan.  HB4407- 9 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (42) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1991 2    by the City of Sullivan.3        (43) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 4    by the City of Oglesby.5        (44) If the ordinance was adopted on July 28, 1987 by 6    the City of Marion.7        (45) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 1990 by 8    the City of Marion.9        (46) If the ordinance was adopted on August 20, 1985 10    by the Village of Mount Prospect.11        (47) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1998 12    by the Village of Woodhull.13        (48) If the ordinance was adopted on April 20, 1993 by 14    the Village of Princeville.15        (49) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1986 by 16    the City of Granite City.17        (50) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1989 18    by the Village of Lombard.19        (51) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 20    by the Village of Gardner.21        (52) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1999 by 22    the Village of Paw Paw.23        (53) If the ordinance was adopted on November 17, 1986 24    by the Village of Franklin Park.25        (54) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 1989 26    by the Village of South Holland.  HB4407- 10 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (55) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1992 by 2    the Village of Riverdale.3        (56) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 4    by the City of Galesburg.5        (57) If the ordinance was adopted on April 1, 1985 by 6    the City of Galesburg.7        (58) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1990 by 8    the City of West Chicago.9        (59) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 10    by the City of Oak Forest.11        (60) If the ordinance was adopted in 1999 by the City 12    of Villa Grove.13        (61) If the ordinance was adopted on January 13, 1987 14    by the Village of Mt. Zion.15        (62) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 16    by the Village of Manteno.17        (63) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 18    the City of Chicago Heights.19        (64) If the ordinance was adopted on January 6, 1999 20    by the Village of Rosemont.21        (65) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 2000 22    by the Village of Stone Park.23        (66) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 24    by the City of DeKalb.25        (67) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1986 26    by the City of Aurora.   HB4407- 11 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (68) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 2    by the Village of Milan.3        (69) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 1994 4    by the City of West Frankfort.5        (70) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 6    by the Village of Libertyville.7        (71) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 8    by the Village of Hoffman Estates. 9        (72) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 10    1986 by the Village of Sherman. 11        (73) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 12    by the City of Macomb.13        (74) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 14    the City of East Peoria to create the West Washington 15    Street TIF.16        (75) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 17    the City of East Peoria to create the Camp Street TIF. 18        (76) If the ordinance was adopted on August 7, 2000 by 19    the City of Des Plaines.20        (77) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 21    by the City of Washington to create the Washington Square 22    TIF #2.23        (78) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 24    by the City of Morris. 25        (79) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 26    the Village of Steeleville.  HB4407- 12 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (80) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 2    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I (the Main St TIF).3        (81) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 4    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF II (the Interstate 5    TIF). 6        (82) If the ordinance was adopted on November 6, 2002 7    by the City of Chicago to create the Madden/Wells TIF 8    District. 9        (83) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 10    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Racine TIF 11    District. 12        (84) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 13    the City of Chicago to create the Stony Island 14    Commercial/Burnside Industrial Corridors TIF District. 15        (85) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 1989 16    by the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Mall TIF 17    District.18        (86) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 1986 19    by the City of Mendota. 20        (87) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 21    by the Village of Cahokia.22        (88) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 23    1999 by the City of Belleville.24        (89) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 25    by the Village of Bellevue to create the Bellevue TIF 26    District 1.  HB4407- 13 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (90) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 1993 2    by the Village of Crete.3        (91) If the ordinance was adopted on February 12, 2001 4    by the Village of Crete.5        (92) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 2001 by 6    the Village of Crete.7        (93) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 8    by the City of Champaign. 9        (94) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 1986 10    by the City of Charleston. 11        (95) If the ordinance was adopted on June 6, 1989 by 12    the Village of Romeoville. 13        (96) If the ordinance was adopted on October 14, 1993 14    and amended on August 2, 2010 by the City of Venice. 15        (97) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1994 by 16    the City of Markham. 17        (98) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1998 by 18    the Village of Bensenville. 19        (99) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1987 20    by the City of Dixon. 21        (100) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 22    1988 by the Village of Lansing. 23        (101) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1998 24    by the City of Moline. 25        (102) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1991 by 26    the Village of Glenwood.   HB4407- 14 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (103) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1992 2    by the City of East Peoria. 3        (104) If the ordinance was adopted on December 14, 4    1998 by the City of Carlyle.5        (105) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000, as 6    subsequently amended, by the City of Chicago to create the 7    Midwest Redevelopment TIF District. 8        (106) If the ordinance was adopted on September 13, 9    1989 by the City of Chicago to create the Michigan/Cermak 10    Area TIF District. 11        (107) If the ordinance was adopted on March 30, 1992 12    by the Village of Ohio. 13        (108) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 14    the Village of Orangeville.15        (109) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 16    1997 by the Village of Germantown. 17        (110) If the ordinance was adopted on April 28, 2003 18    by Gibson City. 19        (111) If the ordinance was adopted on December 18, 20    1990 by the Village of Washington Park, but only after the 21    Village of Washington Park becomes compliant with the 22    reporting requirements under subsection (d) of Section 23    11-74.4-5, and after the State Comptroller's certification 24    of such compliance. 25        (112) If the ordinance was adopted on February 28, 26    2000 by the City of Harvey.  HB4407- 15 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (113) If the ordinance was adopted on January 11, 1991 2    by the City of Chicago to create the Read/Dunning TIF 3    District. 4        (114) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 1991 by 5    the City of Chicago to create the Sanitary and Ship Canal 6    TIF District. 7        (115) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 8    by the City of Naperville. 9        (116) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2002 by 10    the Village of Arlington Heights. 11        (117) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 12    1991 by the Village of Machesney Park. 13        (118) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 14    1993 by the City of Ottawa. 15        (119) If the ordinance was adopted on June 4, 1991 by 16    the Village of Lansing. 17        (120) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 18    2004 by the Village of Fox Lake.19        (121) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 20    1992 by the City of Fairfield.21        (122) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 22    1992 by the City of Mt. Sterling. 23        (123) If the ordinance was adopted on March 15, 2004 24    by the City of Batavia. 25        (124) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 26    by the Village of Lake Zurich.  HB4407- 16 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (125) If the ordinance was adopted on September 23, 2    1997 by the City of Granite City. 3        (126) If the ordinance was adopted on May 8, 2013 by 4    the Village of Rosemont to create the Higgins Road/River 5    Road TIF District No. 6. 6        (127) If the ordinance was adopted on November 22, 7    1993 by the City of Arcola. 8        (128) If the ordinance was adopted on September 7, 9    2004 by the City of Arcola. 10        (129) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 11    1999 by the City of Paris. 12        (130) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 13    1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the U.S. Route 6 East 14    Ottawa TIF. 15        (131) If the ordinance was adopted on May 2, 2002 by 16    the Village of Crestwood. 17        (132) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1992 18    by the City of Blue Island. 19        (133) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 20    1993 by the City of Lacon. 21        (134) If the ordinance was adopted on May 4, 1998 by 22    the Village of Bradford. 23        (135) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 24    the City of Oak Forest. 25        (136) If the ordinance was adopted on November 16, 26    1992 by the City of Pinckneyville.   HB4407- 17 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (137) If the ordinance was adopted on March 1, 2001 by 2    the Village of South Jacksonville. 3        (138) If the ordinance was adopted on February 26, 4    1992 by the City of Chicago to create the Stockyards 5    Southeast Quadrant TIF District.6        (139) If the ordinance was adopted on January 25, 1993 7    by the City of LaSalle.8        (140) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 9    1997 by the Village of Dieterich. 10        (141) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 11    2016 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 12    Balmoral/Pearl TIF No. 8 Tax Increment Financing 13    Redevelopment Project Area. 14        (142) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 15    the City of Oak Forest.16        (143) If the ordinance was adopted on January 31, 1995 17    by the Village of Milledgeville. 18        (144) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1996 19    by the Village of Pearl City. 20        (145) If the ordinance was adopted on December 21, 21    1994 by the City of Calumet City.22        (146) If the ordinance was adopted on May 5, 2003 by 23    the Town of Normal. 24        (147) If the ordinance was adopted on June 2, 1998 by 25    the City of Litchfield. 26        (148) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 1995   HB4407- 18 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    by the City of Marion. 2        (149) If the ordinance was adopted on May 24, 2001 by 3    the Village of Hanover Park. 4        (150) If the ordinance was adopted on May 30, 1995 by 5    the Village of Dalzell. 6        (151) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 1997 7    by the City of Edwardsville. 8        (152) If the ordinance was adopted on September 5, 9    1995 by the City of Granite City. 10        (153) If the ordinance was adopted on June 21, 1999 by 11    the Village of Table Grove. 12        (154) If the ordinance was adopted on February 23, 13    1995 by the City of Springfield. 14        (155) If the ordinance was adopted on August 11, 1999 15    by the City of Monmouth. 16        (156) If the ordinance was adopted on December 26, 17    1995 by the Village of Posen. 18        (157) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1995 by 19    the Village of Caseyville. 20        (158) If the ordinance was adopted on January 30, 1996 21    by the City of Madison. 22        (159) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1996 23    by the Village of Hartford. 24        (160) If the ordinance was adopted on July 2, 1996 by 25    the Village of Manlius. 26        (161) If the ordinance was adopted on March 21, 2000   HB4407- 19 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    by the City of Hoopeston.2        (162) If the ordinance was adopted on March 22, 2005 3    by the City of Hoopeston.4        (163) If the ordinance was adopted on July 10, 1996 by 5    the City of Chicago to create the Goose Island TIF 6    District.7        (164) If the ordinance was adopted on December 11, 8    1996 by the City of Chicago to create the Bryn 9    Mawr/Broadway TIF District.10        (165) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 11    1995 by the City of Chicago to create the 95th/Western TIF 12    District.13        (166) If the ordinance was adopted on October 7, 1998 14    by the City of Chicago to create the 71st and Stony Island 15    TIF District.16        (167) If the ordinance was adopted on April 19, 1995 17    by the Village of North Utica.18        (168) If the ordinance was adopted on April 22, 1996 19    by the City of LaSalle.20        (169) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 2008 by 21    the City of Country Club Hills. 22        (170) If the ordinance was adopted on July 3, 1996 by 23    the Village of Phoenix.24        (171) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1997 by 25    the Village of Swansea.26        (172) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2001   HB4407- 20 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    by the Village of Saunemin.2        (173) If the ordinance was adopted on January 10, 2005 3    by the Village of Romeoville. 4        (174) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 5    by the City of Berwyn for the South Berwyn Corridor Tax 6    Increment Financing District.7        (175) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 8    by the City of Berwyn for the Roosevelt Road Tax Increment 9    Financing District.10        (176) If the ordinance was adopted on May 3, 2001 by 11    the Village of Hanover Park for the Village Center Tax 12    Increment Financing Redevelopment Project Area (TIF # 3).13        (177) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 1996 14    by the City of Savanna. 15        (178) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2002 16    by the Village of Okawville.17        (179) If the ordinance was adopted on October 4, 1999 18    by the City of Vandalia.19        (180) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2003 by 20    the City of Rushville.21        (181) If the ordinance was adopted on December 7, 1998 22    by the City of Quincy for the Central Business District 23    West Tax Increment Redevelopment Project Area. 24        (182) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 25    by the Village of Maywood approving the Roosevelt Road TIF 26    District.   HB4407- 21 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (183) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 2    by the Village of Maywood approving the Madison 3    Street/Fifth Avenue TIF District. 4        (184) If the ordinance was adopted on November 10, 5    1997 by the Village of Park Forest. 6        (185) If the ordinance was adopted on July 30, 1997 by 7    the City of Chicago to create the Near North TIF district. 8        (186) If the ordinance was adopted on December 1, 2000 9    by the Village of Mahomet. 10        (187) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 1999 by 11    the Village of Washburn. 12        (188) If the ordinance was adopted on August 19, 1998 13    by the Village of New Berlin. 14        (189) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 15    by the City of Highwood. 16        (190) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1997 by 17    the City of Flora. 18        (191) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 1999 19    by the City of Ottawa. 20        (192) If the ordinance was adopted on June 13, 2005 by 21    the City of Mount Carroll. 22        (193) If the ordinance was adopted on March 25, 2008 23    by the Village of Elizabeth. 24        (194) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 25    2000 by the City of Mount Pulaski. 26        (195) If the ordinance was adopted on November 21,   HB4407- 22 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    2000 by the City of Effingham.2        (196) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2003 3    by the City of Effingham. 4        (197) If the ordinance was adopted on February 4, 2008 5    by the City of Polo. 6        (198) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 2005 7    by the Village of Bellwood to create the Park Place TIF.8        (199) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 9    the Village of Bellwood to create the North-2014 TIF.10        (200) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 11    the Village of Bellwood to create the South-2014 TIF.12        (201) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 13    the Village of Bellwood to create the Central Metro-2014 14    TIF.15        (202) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 16    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 17    Creek "A" (Southwest)-2014 TIF.18        (203) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 19    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 20    Creek "B" (Northwest)-2014 TIF.21        (204) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 22    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 23    Creek "C" (Northeast)-2014 TIF.24        (205) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 25    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 26    Creek "D" (Southeast)-2014 TIF.  HB4407- 23 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (206) If the ordinance was adopted on June 26, 2007 by 2    the City of Peoria.3        (207) If the ordinance was adopted on October 28, 2008 4    by the City of Peoria. 5        (208) If the ordinance was adopted on April 4, 2000 by 6    the City of Joliet to create the Joliet City Center TIF 7    District. 8        (209) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 9    the City of Chicago to create the 43rd/Cottage Grove TIF 10    district. 11        (210) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 12    the City of Chicago to create the 79th Street Corridor TIF 13    district. 14        (211) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 15    by the City of Chicago to create the Bronzeville TIF 16    district. 17        (212) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 18    by the City of Chicago to create the Homan/Arthington TIF 19    district. 20        (213) If the ordinance was adopted on December 8, 1998 21    by the Village of Plainfield. 22        (214) If the ordinance was adopted on July 17, 2000 by 23    the Village of Homer.24        (215) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 25    2006 by the City of Greenville.26        (216) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by   HB4407- 24 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    the City of Chicago to create the Kinzie Industrial TIF 2    district.3        (217) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1998 4    by the City of Chicago to create the Northwest Industrial 5    TIF district.6        (218) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 7    the City of Chicago to create the Pilsen Industrial TIF 8    district.9        (219) If the ordinance was adopted on January 14, 1997 10    by the City of Chicago to create the 35th/Halsted TIF 11    district.12        (220) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 1999 by 13    the City of Chicago to create the Pulaski Corridor TIF 14    district. 15        (221) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 16    1997 by the City of Springfield to create the Enos Park 17    Neighborhood TIF District. 18        (222) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 19    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Cicero 20    redevelopment project area. 21        (223) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 22    by the City of Chicago to create the Western/Ogden 23    redevelopment project area. 24        (224) If the ordinance was adopted on July 21, 1999 by 25    the City of Chicago to create the 24th/Michigan Avenue 26    redevelopment project area.   HB4407- 25 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (225) If the ordinance was adopted on January 20, 1999 2    by the City of Chicago to create the Woodlawn 3    redevelopment project area. 4        (226) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 5    the City of Chicago to create the Clark/Montrose 6    redevelopment project area. 7        (227) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 2003 8    by the City of Madison to create the Rivers Edge 9    redevelopment project area. 10        (228) If the ordinance was adopted on August 12, 2003 11    by the City of Madison to create the Caine Street 12    redevelopment project area. 13        (229) If the ordinance was adopted on March 7, 2000 by 14    the City of Madison to create the East Madison TIF. 15        (230) If the ordinance was adopted on August 3, 2001 16    by the Village of Aviston. 17        (231) If the ordinance was adopted on August 22, 2011 18    by the Village of Warren. 19        (232) If the ordinance was adopted on April 8, 1999 by 20    the City of Farmer City.21        (233) If the ordinance was adopted on August 4, 1999 22    by the Village of Fairmont City.23        (234) If the ordinance was adopted on October 2, 1999 24    by the Village of Fairmont City. 25        (235) If the ordinance was adopted December 16, 1999 26    by the City of Springfield.   HB4407- 26 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (236) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 2    1999 by the Village of Palatine to create the Village of 3    Palatine Downtown Area TIF District.4        (237) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 5    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the 111th/Kedzie 6    redevelopment project area.7        (238) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 8    1998 by the City of Chicago to create the Canal/Congress 9    redevelopment project area.10        (239) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 11    the City of Chicago to create the Galewood/Armitage 12    Industrial redevelopment project area.13        (240) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 14    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the Madison/Austin 15    Corridor redevelopment project area.16        (241) If the ordinance was adopted on April 12, 2000 17    by the City of Chicago to create the South Chicago 18    redevelopment project area. 19        (242) If the ordinance was adopted on January 9, 2002 20    by the Village of Elkhart. 21        (243) If the ordinance was adopted on May 23, 2000 by 22    the City of Robinson to create the West Robinson 23    Industrial redevelopment project area. 24        (244) If the ordinance was adopted on October 9, 2001 25    by the City of Robinson to create the Downtown Robinson 26    redevelopment project area.   HB4407- 27 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (245) If the ordinance was adopted on September 19, 2    2000 by the Village of Valmeyer. 3        (246) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 2002 4    by the City of McHenry to create the Downtown TIF 5    district. 6        (247) If the ordinance was adopted on February 15, 7    1999 by the Village of Channahon. 8        (248) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 9    2000 by the City of Peoria. 10        (249) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 2000 by 11    the City of Rock Island to create the North 11th Street 12    redevelopment project area.13        (250) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 14    by the City of Champaign to create the North Campustown 15    TIF. 16        (251) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 17    2000 by the Village of Evergreen Park. 18        (252) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 19    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the 20    Fullerton/Milwaukee redevelopment project area. 21        (253) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 2006 22    by the Village of Bourbonnais to create the Bourbonnais 23    Industrial Park Conservation Area.24        (254) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 25    2000 by the City of Geneva to create the East State Street 26    redevelopment project area.  HB4407- 28 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (255) If the ordinance was adopted on February 6, 2001 2    by the Village of Downers Grove to create the Ogden Avenue 3    redevelopment project area.4        (256) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 5    the City of Chicago to create the Division/Homan 6    redevelopment project area.7        (257) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000 by 8    the City of Chicago to create the 63rd/Pulaski 9    redevelopment project area.10        (258) If the ordinance was adopted on March 10, 1999 11    by the City of Chicago to create the Greater Southwest 12    Industrial (East) redevelopment project area.13        (259) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 14    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Kedzie 15    redevelopment project area.16        (260) If the ordinance was adopted on November 3, 1999 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Lincoln Avenue 18    redevelopment project area.19        (261) If the ordinance was adopted on September 3, 20    2015 by the Village of Fox River Grove to create the 21    Downtown TIF #2 redevelopment project area. 22        (262) If the ordinance was adopted on October 16, 2000 23    by the Village of Franklin Park to create the Downtown 24    Franklin Avenue redevelopment project area.25        (263) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 26    2003 by the City of Jacksonville to create the Downtown   HB4407- 29 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    Redevelopment Project Area.2        (264) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2002 3    by the City of Prophetstown to create the Redevelopment 4    Project Area No. 1.5        (265) If the ordinance was adopted on August 29, 2006 6    by the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Dayton 7    Industrial TIF District.8        (266) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2006 by 9    the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Canal TIF 10    District.11        (267) If the ordinance was adopted on March 5, 2001 by 12    the City of Salem to create the TIF No 2 - Redevelopment 13    Area.14        (268) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 2002 15    by the Village of Malta to create the Harkness Property 16    redevelopment project area.17        (269) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2008 by 18    the City of Highland to create TIF #1.19        (270) If the ordinance was adopted on January 3, 2012 20    by the City of Highland to create TIF #2.21        (271) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 2000 22    by the City of Chicago to create the Belmont/Central 23    redevelopment project area.24        (272) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 25    the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Neighborhood 26    redevelopment project area.  HB4407- 30 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (273) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 2    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lake Calumet Area 3    Industrial redevelopment project area.4        (274) If the ordinance was adopted on October 15, 2001 5    by the City of Des Plaines to create TIF No. 6 Mannheim 6    Higgins Road. 7        (275) If the ordinance was adopted on October 22, 2001 8    by the City of Sullivan to create TIF District III. 9        (276) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 10    2013 by the City of Oak Forest to create the City of Oak 11    Forest Cicero Avenue Tax Increment Financing District 12    Redevelopment Project Area TIF District #6. 13        (277) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 14    2003 by the City of Knoxville.15        (278) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 16    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Peterson/Pulaski 17    redevelopment project area.18        (279) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 19    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Central West 20    redevelopment project area.21        (280) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 22    the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Broadway 23    redevelopment project area.24        (281) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 25    by the City of St. Charles for the First Street District 26    #4.  HB4407- 31 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (282) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 2    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Seniors First 3    TIF.4        (283) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 5    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Zenith Opus TIF. 6        (284) If the ordinance was adopted on June 24, 2003 by 7    the City of Lewistown to create Lewistown TIF District 1. 8        (285) If the ordinance was adopted on April 10, 2002 9    by the City of Elgin to create the Central Area TIF 10    Redevelopment Project Area.11        (286) If the ordinance was adopted on February 17, 12    2004 by the City of Carbondale to create TIF Redevelopment 13    Project Area #1.14        (287) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2008 by 15    the City of Pittsfield to create Pittsfield TIF District 16    #1. 17        (288) If the ordinance was adopted on June 22, 2005 by 18    the City of Fairview Heights to create the Shoppes of St. 19    Clair Redevelopment Area. 20        (289) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 21    by the City of Fairview Heights to create the Lincoln 22    Trail Redevelopment Area. 23        (290) If the ordinance was adopted on May 7, 2008 by 24    the City of Vienna to create Vienna TIF #1.25        (291) If the ordinance was adopted on August 8, 2000 26    by the Village of Lyons to create Village of Lyons TIF   HB4407- 32 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    District #1 (North Ogden).2        (292) If the ordinance was adopted on August 8, 2000 3    by the Village of Lyons to create Village of Lyons TIF 4    District #2 (South Ogden/Joliet).5        (293) If the ordinance was adopted on March 20, 2002 6    by the Village of Bridgeview to create Bridgeview Harlem 7    Avenue TIF District #1. 8    (d) For redevelopment project areas for which bonds were 9issued before July 29, 1991, or for which contracts were 10entered into before June 1, 1988, in connection with a 11redevelopment project in the area within the State Sales Tax 12Boundary, the estimated dates of completion of the 13redevelopment project and retirement of obligations to finance 14redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 15Section 11-74.4-7) may be extended by municipal ordinance to 16December 31, 2013. The termination procedures of subsection 17(b) of Section 11-74.4-8 are not required for these 18redevelopment project areas in 2009 but are required in 2013. 19The extension allowed by Public Act 87-1272 shall not apply to 20real property tax increment allocation financing under Section 2111-74.4-8.22    (e) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 23increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 24only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 25project areas that were adopted on or after December 16, 1986 26and for which at least $8 million worth of municipal bonds were   HB4407- 33 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1authorized on or after December 19, 1989 but before January 1, 21990; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 3of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 4of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 5written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 6constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 7project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.8    (f) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 9increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 10only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 11project areas that were established on or after December 1, 121981 but before January 1, 1982 and for which at least 13$1,500,000 worth of tax increment revenue bonds were 14authorized on or after September 30, 1990 but before July 1, 151991; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 16of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 17of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 18written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 19constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 20project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.21    (f-1) (Blank). 22    (f-2) (Blank). 23    (f-3) (Blank). 24    (f-5) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 25increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 26only, shall be not more than 47 years for redevelopment   HB4407- 34 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1project areas listed in this subsection; provided that (i) the 2municipality adopts an ordinance extending the life of the 3redevelopment project area to 47 years and (ii) the 4municipality provides notice to the taxing bodies that would 5otherwise constitute the joint review board for the 6redevelopment project area not more than 30 and not less than 714 days prior to the adoption of that ordinance: 8        (1) If the redevelopment project area was established 9    on December 29, 1981 by the City of Springfield. 10        (2) If the redevelopment project area was established 11    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Morris and that is 12    known as the Morris TIF District 1. 13        (3) If the redevelopment project area was established 14    on December 31, 1986 by the Village of Cahokia. 15        (4) If the redevelopment project area was established 16    on December 20, 1986 by the City of Charleston. 17        (5) If the redevelopment project area was established 18    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Beardstown. 19        (6) If the redevelopment project area was established 20    on December 23, 1986 by the Town of Cicero. 21        (7) If the redevelopment project area was established 22    on December 29, 1986 by the City of East St. Louis. 23        (8) If the redevelopment project area was established 24    on January 23, 1991 by the City of East St. Louis. 25        (9) If the redevelopment project area was established 26    on December 29, 1986 by the Village of Gardner.   HB4407- 35 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1        (10) If the redevelopment project area was established 2    on June 11, 2002 by the City of East Peoria to create the 3    West Washington Street TIF. 4        (11) If the redevelopment project area was established 5    on December 22, 1986 by the City of Washington creating 6    the Washington Square TIF #2.7        (12) If the redevelopment project area was established 8    on November 11, 1986 by the City of Pekin.9        (13) If the redevelopment project area was established 10    on December 30, 1986 by the City of Belleville. 11        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 12    the City of Chicago Heights. 13        (15) If the redevelopment project area was established 14    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I 15    (the Main St TIF). 16        (16) If the redevelopment project area was established 17    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF 18    II (the Interstate TIF). 19        (17) If the redevelopment project area was established 20    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Sparta to create TIF 21    #1. Any termination procedures provided for in Section 22    11-74.4-8 are not required for this redevelopment project 23    area prior to the 47th calendar year after the year in 24    which the ordinance approving the redevelopment project 25    year was adopted. 26        (18) If the redevelopment project area was established   HB4407- 36 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1    on March 30, 1992 by the Village of Ohio to create the 2    Village of Ohio TIF District.3        (19) If the redevelopment project area was established 4    on December 13, 1993 by the Village of Crete.5        (20) If the redevelopment project area was established 6    on February 12, 2001 by the Village of Crete.7        (21) If the redevelopment project area was established 8    on April 23, 2001 by the Village of Crete.9        (22) If the redevelopment project area was established 10    on December 29, 1993 by the City of Ottawa to create the 11    Ottawa I-80 North TIF District.12        (23) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on September 20, 1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the 14    Ottawa Rt. 6 East TIF District.15        (24) If the redevelopment project area was established 16    on January 6, 1999 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 17    Village of Rosemont TIF 4 South River Road.18        (25) If the redevelopment project area was established 19    on December 20, 1988 by the Village of Lansing.20        (26) If the redevelopment project area was established 21    on November 20, 1989 by the Village of South Holland.22        (27) If the redevelopment project area was established 23    on December 11, 1989 by the Village of Melrose Park to 24    create the Mid-Metros TIF. 25    No further extensions under this subsection may occur 26after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th   HB4407- 37 -LRB104 17013 RTM 30428 b1General Assembly.2    (g) In consolidating the material relating to completion 3dates from Sections 11-74.4-3 and 11-74.4-7 into this Section, 4it is not the intent of the General Assembly to make any 5substantive change in the law, except for the extension of the 6completion dates for the City of Aurora, the Village of Milan, 7the City of West Frankfort, the Village of Libertyville, and 8the Village of Hoffman Estates set forth under items (67), 9(68), (69), (70), and (71) of subsection (c) of this Section. 10(Source: P.A. 103-315, eff. 7-28-23; 103-575, eff. 12-8-23; 11103-1016, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1058, eff. 12-31-24; 104-322, eff. 128-15-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.